Maryland, session 2026, SB0285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
Subtitle 38. Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS Scholarship Program.
18–3801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “CORRECTIONAL OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–201 OF
THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
[(b)] (C) “Eligible institution” means:
(1) A public senior higher education institution in the State; or
(2) A community college in the State.
[(c)] (D) “Police officer” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of the Public Safety
Article.
– 1 –

Ch. 681 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(d)] (E) “Probation agent” means an individual serving as a parole and
probation agent, supervisor, or regional administrator for the Department of Public Safety
and Correctional Services.
[(e)] (F) “Service obligation” means to work as a police officer or probation agent
in the State not less than 5 years during the 8–year period after graduation.
18–3802.
(a) There is a Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship Program.
(b) The purpose of the program is to provide tuition assistance for students who
are:
(1) Attending an eligible institution and enrolled in a degree OR
CERTIFICATE program that would further the student’s intent to become a police officer
[or], probation agent, OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER after graduation; or
(2) Employed as a police officer [or], probation agent, OR CORRECTIONAL
OFFICER, attending an eligible institution, and enrolled in a degree OR CERTIFICATE
program that would further the police officer’s [or], probation officer’s, OR
CORRECTIONAL OFFICER’S career.
(c) The Office shall publicize the availability of the Maryland Police Officers
[and], Probation Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship.
18–3803.
(a) Each year, the Office shall select eligible students and offer a scholarship to
each student selected to be used at an eligible institution of the student’s choice.
(b) A recipient of the Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship shall:
(1) Be a Maryland resident or have graduated from a Maryland high
school;
(2) Be accepted for admission or currently enrolled at an eligible institution
as a full–time or part–time undergraduate or graduate student pursuing a course of study
or program, PROGRAM, OR CERTIFICATE that would further the recipient’s career;
(3) Sign a letter of intent to perform the service obligation on completion of
the recipient’s required studies; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 681
(4) Satisfy any additional criteria the Commission may establish.
(c) A current police officer [or], probation agent, OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER
shall be eligible for a Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship if they meet the eligibility criteria under
subsection (b) of this section.
18–3804.
The recipient of a Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship shall repay the Commission the funds received
as set forth in § 18–112 of this title if the recipient does not:
(1) Satisfy the degree OR CERTIFICATE requirements of the eligible course
of study or program or fulfill other requirements as provided in this subtitle; or
(2) Perform the service obligation to work as a police officer [or], probation
agent, OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER for at least 5 years during the 8–year period after
graduation.
18–3807.
The Office shall:
(1) Publicize the availability of Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation
Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarships; and
(2) To the extent practicable, award scholarships under this subtitle in a
manner that reflects ethnic, gender, racial, and geographic diversity.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –